Utah statutes.
20A-6-106 (Superseded 01/01/12).   Deadline for submission of ballot titles.

Unless otherwise specifically provided for by statute, the certified ballot title of each ballot proposition, ballot question, or ballot issue shall be submitted to the election officer no later than 60 days before the date of the election at which the matter will be submitted to the voters.

